Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.070

Application for license—Contents.

Application for a license shall be on a form prescribed by the director and shall state the full name of the person applying for such license and if the applicant is an individual, receiver, trustee, firm, exchange, partnership, association or corporation, the full name of each member of the firm or partnership, or the names of the officers of the exchange, association or corporation shall be given in the application. Such application shall further state the principal business address of the applicant in the state and elsewhere and the name or names of the person authorized to receive and accept service of summons and legal notices of all kinds for the applicant and any other necessary information prescribed by the director.

[ 1959 c 139 s 7.]